Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202560-3209
Data not considered public record; protection orders; effect.

(1) Captured plate data held by a governmental entity is not considered a public record for purposes of sections 84-712 to 84-712.09 and shall only be disclosed to the person to whom the vehicle is registered or with the prior written consent of the person to whom the vehicle is registered or pursuant to a disclosure order under subsection (2) of section 60-3205 or as the result of a match pursuant to subsection (2) of section 60-3203.

(2) Upon the presentation to a governmental entity of a valid, outstanding protection order pursuant to the Protection Orders Act or the Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act protecting the driver of a vehicle jointly registered with or registered solely in the name of the individual against whom the order was issued, captured plate data may not be disclosed except pursuant to a disclosure order under subsection (2) of section 60-3205 or as the result of a match pursuant to subsection (2) of section 60-3203.

Laws 2018, LB93, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 46.

Protection Orders Act, see section 26-101.

Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act, see section 42-932.